Utah statutes.
40-6-15.   Division created -- Functions -- Director of division --
Qualifications of program administrators.
There is created within the Department of Natural Resources the Division of
Oil, Gas, and Mining.  The division shall implement the policies and orders of
the board and perform all other duties delegated by the board.
The director of the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining shall be appointed by the
director of the Department of Natural Resources with the concurrence of the
Board of Oil, Gas, and Mining.  The director shall be the executive and
administrative head of the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining and shall be a
person experienced in administration and knowledgeable in the extraction of
oil, gas, and minerals.
Within the division, the person administering the oil and gas program shall
have the technical background to efficiently administer that program.  The
person administering the mining program shall have the technical background to
efficiently administer that program.
